Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2040.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 66-1,178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
66-1,178. (a) No electric utility may begin site preparation for or
construction of an electric transmission line, or exercise the right of
eminent domain to acquire any interest in land in connection with the
site preparation for a construction of any such line without first
acquiring a siting permit from the commission. Whenever any electric
utility desires to obtain such a permit, the utility shall file an application
with the commission setting forth therein that the utility proposes to
construct an electric transmission line and specifying:
(1) The proposed location thereof;
(2) the names and addresses of the landowners of record whose
land or interest therein is proposed to be acquired in connection with
the construction of or is located within 660 feet of the center line of the
easement where the line is proposed to be located; and
(3) such other information as may be required by the commission.
(b) Upon the filing of an application pursuant to subsection (a),
the commission shall fix a time for a public hearing on such
application, which shall be not more than 90 days after the date the
application was filed, to determine the necessity for and the
reasonableness of the location of the proposed electric transmission
line. The commission shall fix the place for hearing, which shall be in
one of the counties through which the electric transmission line is
proposed to traverse.
(c) The commission may conduct an evidentiary hearing on an
application filed pursuant to this section at such time and place as the
commission deems appropriate.
(d) The commission shall issue a final order on the application
within 120 180 days after the date the application was filed.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 66-1,178 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
______________________________________________________________________________
Governor.